Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.586

Resignation of registered agent.

A registered agent of a foreign limited liability partnership may resign as agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of resignation in accordance with RCW 23.95.445.

[ 2015 c 176 s 5119; 2009 c 437 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.